Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB300.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3733.1(a) and (c) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 3733.1. Surcharge.(a) Imposition of surcharge.--In addition to each fee imposed under section 3733(a.1) (relating to deposits into account), except as set forth in subsection (b), the following apply:* * *(4) A permanent fee of $2.25 shall be charged and collected on a filing relating to a civil action.* * *12345678910111213141516171819 (c) Allocation and appropriation.--* * *(4) The fee under subsection (a)(4) shall be collected and paid in accordance with section 3572 (relating to county portion of fines, etc.) and used in accordance with section 5806.3 (relating to legal representation in forfeiture proceedings).Section 2. Title 42 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5806.3. Legal representation in forfeiture proceedings.Notwithstanding the act of December 2, 1968 (P.L.1144, No.358), known as the Public Defender Act, the following shall apply:(1) If a person with standing files a claim to contest the forfeiture of property in a forfeiture proceeding under this chapter and is financially unable to obtain legal representation by an attorney and the property subject to forfeiture is real property, the court of common pleas having jurisdiction over the property, at the request of the person, shal l provide the person with an attorney for the purpose of providing legal representation with respect to the claim. (2) If a person with standing who has not been charged in a related criminal case files a claim to contest the forfeiture of property in a forfeiture proceeding under this chapter and is financially unable to obtain legal representation by an attorney, the court of common pleas having jurisdiction may provide the person with an attorney for the purpose of providing legal representation with respect to the claim.(3) In determining whether to provide legal representation under this section, the court of common pleas 20250SB0300PN0234 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 having jurisdiction shall take into account the following factors:(i) The person's standing to file a claim to contest the forfeiture.(ii) Whether the claim appears to be made in good faith.(4) Each county in this Commonwealth shall develop procedures and use funds received from the fee authorized in section 3733.1(a)(4) (relating to surcharge) for the purpose of administering this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0300PN0234 - 3 - 1234567891011